Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 2
Powers of Foreign Personal Representatives

§ 15-4-201. Payment of debt and delivery of property to domiciliary foreign personal representative without local administration.

At any time after the expiration of sixty (60) days from the death of a nonresident decedent, any person indebted to the estate of the nonresident decedent or having possession or control of personal property, or of an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock or chose in action belonging to the estate of the nonresident decedent may pay the debt, deliver the personal property, or the instrument evidencing the debt, obligation, stock or chose in action, to the domiciliary foreign personal representative of the nonresident decedent upon being presented with proof of his appointment and an affidavit made by or on behalf of the representative stating:

The date of the death of the nonresident decedent;

That no local administration, or application or petition therefor, is pending in this state;

That the domiciliary foreign personal representative is entitled to payment or delivery.

§ 15-4-202. Payment or delivery discharges.

Payment or delivery made in good faith on the basis of the proof of authority and affidavit releases the debtor or person having possession of the personal property to the same extent as if payment or delivery had been made to a local personal representative.

§ 15-4-203. Resident creditor notice.

Payment or delivery under section 15-4-201[, Idaho Code,] of this Part may not be made if a resident creditor of the nonresident decedent has notified the debtor of the nonresident decedent or the person having possession of the personal property belonging to the nonresident decedent that the debt should not be paid nor the property delivered to the domiciliary foreign personal representative.

§ 15-4-204. Proof of authority — Bond.

If no local administration or application or petition therefor is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign personal representative may file with a court in this state in a county in which property belonging to the decedent is located, authenticated copies of his appointment and of any official bond he has given.

§ 15-4-205. Powers.

A domiciliary foreign personal representative who has complied with section 15-4-204[, Idaho Code,] of this Part may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local personal representative and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

§ 15-4-206. Power of representatives in transition.

The power of a domiciliary foreign personal representative under section 15-4-201 or 15-4-205[, Idaho Code,] of this Part shall be exercised only if there is no administration or application therefor pending in this state. An application or petition for local administration of the estate terminates the power of the foreign personal representative to act under section 15-4-205[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, but the local court may allow the foreign personal representative to exercise limited powers to preserve the estate. No person who, before receiving actual notice of a pending local administration, has changed his position in reliance upon the powers of a foreign personal representative shall be prejudiced by reason of the application or petition for, or grant of, local administration. The local personal representative is subject to all duties and obligations which have accrued by virtue of the exercise of the powers by the foreign personal representative and may be substituted for him in any action or proceedings in this state.

§ 15-4-207. Ancillary and other local administrations — Provisions governing.

In respect to a nonresident decedent, the provisions of chapter 3[, title 15, Idaho Code, of this code govern (1) proceedings, if any, in a court of this state for probate of the will, appointment, removal, supervision, and discharge of the local personal representative, and any other order concerning the estate; and (2) the status, powers, duties and liabilities of any local personal representative and the rights of claimants, purchasers, distributees and others in regard to a local administration.